District of Columbia statutes.
47-1378

Final order.

Upon the occurrence of the last event specified in § 47-1374(e), a plaintiff may be entitled to judgment foreclosing the right of redemption. An interlocutory order shall not be required. The judgment shall be final and conclusive on the defendants, their heirs, devisees, and personal representatives and they, or any of their heirs, devisees, executors, administrators, assigns, or successors in right, title, or interest, shall be bound by the judgment as if they had been named in the action and personally served with process.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).